nl: American football handschoen certificering: NCAA-conform; NFHS-conform; NOCSAE-gecertificeerd; Niet gecertificeerd; SFIA-goedgekeurd; Overige
de: Zertifizierung des Footballhandschuhs: NCAA-konform; NFHS-konform; NOCSAE-zertifiziert; Nicht zertifiziert; SFIA-zugelassen; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 美式足球手套認證: 符合 NCAA 標準; 符合 NFHS 標準; NOCSAE 認證; 未認證; SFIA 批准; 其他
hr-HR: Certifikacija nogometnih rukavica: U skladu s NCAA; U skladu s NFHS; NOCSAE certifikat; Nema certifikat; SFIA odobrenje; Ostalo
fr: Certification des gants de football: Conforme NCAA; Conforme NFHS; Certifié NOCSAE; Non certifié; Approuvé SFIA; Autre
tr: Futbol eldiveni sertifikası: NCAA uyumlu; NFHS uyumlu; NOCSAE sertifikalı; Sertifikasız; SFIA onaylı; Diğer
bg-BG: Сертификация на футболни ръкавици: Съвместими с NCAA; Съвместими с NFHS; Сертифицирани по NOCSAE; Без сертификат; Одобрени от SFIA; Друга
hu: Futballkesztyű-tanúsítvány: NCAA-kompatibilis; NFHS-kompatibilis; NOCSAE-tanúsítvánnyal rendelkező; Nem tanúsított; SFIA által jóváhagyott; Egyéb
zh-CN: 足球手套认证: 符合 NCAA 规定; 符合 NFHS 规定; NOCSAE 认证; 未认证; SFIA 批准; 其他
sk-SK: Certifikácia futbalových rukavíc: V súlade s NCAA; V súlade s NFHS; Certifikát NOCSAE; Bez certifikácie; Schválené SFIA; Iné
sl-SI: Certificiranje nogometnih rokavic: Skladno z NCAA; Skladno z NFHS; Certificirano po NOCSAE; Ni certificirano; Odobreno pri SFIA; Drugo
ro-RO: Certificare mănuși de fotbal: Conform NCAA; Conform NFHS; Certificat NOCSAE; Necertificat; Aprobat SFIA; Altele
nb: Sertifisering av fotballhanske: NCAA-godkjent; NFHS-godkjent; NOCSAE-sertifisert; Ikke sertifisert; SFIA-godkjent; Annet
ru: Сертификация футбольных перчаток: Соответствует стандартам NCAA; Соответствует стандартам NFHS; Сертифицировано NOCSAE; Без сертификации; Одобрено SFIA; Другое
cs: Certifikace fotbalových rukavic: Odpovídá normám NCAA; Odpovídá normám NFHS; Certifikace NOCSAE; Bez certifikace; Schváleno SFIA; Jiné
it: Certificazione guanto da calcio: Conforme NCAA; Conforme NFHS; Certificato NOCSAE; Non certificato; Approvato SFIA; Altro
el: Πιστοποίηση γαντιών ποδοσφαίρου: Συμβατό με NCAA; Συμβατό με NFHS; Πιστοποίηση NOCSAE; Χωρίς πιστοποίηση; Εγκεκριμένο από SFIA; Άλλο
ja: フットボールグローブの認証: NCAA 準拠; NFHS 準拠; NOCSAE 認定; 未認定; SFIA 承認; その他
fi: Jalkapallokäsineiden sertifiointi: NCAA-yhteensopiva; NFHS-yhteensopiva; NOCSAE-sertifioitu; Ei sertifioitu; SFIA-hyväksytty; Muu
pt-BR: Certificação de luvas de futebol americano: Em conformidade com a NCAA; Em conformidade com a NFHS; Certificação NOCSAE; Não certificada; Aprovada pela SFIA; Outra
da: Certificering af fodboldhandsker: I overensstemmelse med NCAA; I overensstemmelse med NFHS; NOCSAE-certificeret; Ikke-certificeret; SFIA-godkendt; Andet
en: Football glove certification: NCAA compliant; NFHS compliant; NOCSAE certified; Not certified; SFIA approved; Other
sv: Certifiering för fotbollshandskar: NCAA-godkänd; NFHS-godkänd; NOCSAE-certifierad; Ej certifierad; SFIA-godkänd; Övrigt
pt-PT: Certificação de luvas de futebol americano: Em conformidade com a NCAA; Em conformidade com a NFHS; Com certificação NOCSAE; Não certificado; Aprovado pela SFIA; Outro
lt-LT: Futbolo pirštinių sertifikavimas: Atitinka NCAA reikalavimus; Atitinka NFHS reikalavimus; Sertifikuota NOCSAE; Nesertifikuota; Patvirtinta SFIA; Kita
th: การรับรองถุงมือฟุตบอล: เป็นไปตามมาตรฐาน NCAA; เป็นไปตามมาตรฐาน NFHS; ได้รับการรับรองจาก NOCSAE; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; ได้รับการอนุมัติจาก SFIA; อื่นๆ
pl: Certyfikacja rękawic piłkarskich: Zgodne z przepisami NCAA; Zgodne z przepisami NFHS; Certyfikat NOCSAE; Brak certyfikatu; Zatwierdzone przez SFIA; Inny
es: Certificación de guantes de fútbol americano: Cumple con la NCAA; Cumple con la NFHS; Certificado por la NOCSAE; Sin certificación; Aprobado por la SFIA; Otro
ko: 미국 축구 글러브 인증: NCAA 규격 준수; NFHS 규격 준수; NOCSAE 인증; 미인증; SFIA 승인; 기타
vi: Chứng nhận găng tay bóng bầu dục: Tuân thủ NCAA; Tuân thủ NFHS; Chứng nhận NOCSAE; Không được chứng nhận; Được SFIA phê duyệt; Khác